test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-bisste_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - bissti: # N_EVEN (with final -i in nom.sg)
    bissti+N+Sg+Nom: bissti
    bissti+N+Sg+Gen: bisti
    bissti+N+Sg+Acc: bistiv
    bissti+N+Sg+Ill: bisstij
    bissti+N+Sg+Ine: bistin
    bissti+N+Sg+Ela: [bistist, bistis]
    bissti+N+Sg+Com: [bistijn, bistijna]
    bissti+N+Pl+Nom: bisti
    bissti+N+Pl+Gen: bistij
    bissti+N+Pl+Acc: bistijd
    bissti+N+Pl+Ill: bistijda
    bissti+N+Pl+Ine: bistijn
    bissti+N+Pl+Ela: [bistijst, bistijs]
    bissti+N+Pl+Com: [bistij, bistijgum]
    bissti+N+Ess: bisstin
    bissti+N+Abe: bistidak
